Tennessee, session 114, SB0526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-718(b), is amended by deleting
the language "signed," and substituting instead the language "signed by the person or the
person's authorized representative,".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0526
001888
- 1 -